North Dakota, session 69, HB1550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 6 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Nursing and basic care facility loan guarantee program - Administration.
1. The Bank of North Dakota shall:
a. Administer the nursing and basic care facility loan guarantee program to
guarantee loans for the construction or renovation of nursing and basic care
facilities; and
b. Establish the types of loans and related projects eligible to be guaranteed under
this chapter.
2. The Bank of North Dakota may accept and administer, on behalf of the state from any
source, any property or any interest in the property, and the income from the property
or interest, for any purpose of the nursing and basic care facility loan guarantee
program.
3. A guarantee obligation of the Bank of North Dakota is not payable out of any moneys
of the Bank of North Dakota except those made available to the Bank of North Dakota
under this chapter.
Establishment and maintenance of adequate guarantee funds - Use of strategic
investment and improvements fund.
The Bank of North Dakota shall establish and maintain an adequate guarantee reserve fund
in a special account in the Bank of North Dakota. The Bank of North Dakota may request the
director of the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the strategic investment
Page No. 1 25.1223.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
and improvements fund under section 15 - 08.1 - 08 to maintain one hundred percent of the
guarantee reserve fund balance. Transfers from the strategic investment and improvements
fund may not exceed a total of one hundred million dollars. Moneys in the guarantee reserve
fund are available to reimburse lenders for guaranteed loans in default. Any interest and
earnings received must be deposited in the reserve fund. The Bank of North Dakota shall
determine the amount of reserves for all guaranteed loans by a formula that will assure an
adequate amount of reserve.
Procedure on default of guaranteed loan.
If it appears to the satisfaction of the Bank of North Dakota that a guaranteed loan is in
default, and the eligible lender has certified this fact to the Bank of North Dakota, the Bank of
North Dakota shall reimburse the eligible lender making the loan from the reserve fund to the
extent the loan was guaranteed by the fund. When payment off the guaranteed principal
balance of any guaranteed loan is demanded of the Bank of North Dakota, the note and
accompanying evidence of the loan must be tendered to the Bank of North Dakota in a manner
and form to confer good title to allow the Bank of North Dakota to collect the loan in the manner
the Bank of North Dakota determines according to law. A statute of limitations may not be used
as a defense against collection, through court proceedings, of any loan guaranteed under this
chapter. Any funds collected by the Bank of North Dakota, less any collection fees, must be
deposited in the reserve fund.
Fees for reasonable costs.
The Bank of North Dakota may charge a participating lender reasonable fees for the
guaranteeing of loans under this chapter, and the fees must be available to defray costs of
administering the loan program. Fees in excess of the amount required to pay the cost of
administering the program must be deposited in the reserve fund.
Page No. 2 25.1223.01000